Utah statutes.
73-4-10.   Amendment of pleadings -- Extensions of time.
The court shall have power to allow amendments to any petition, statement or
pleading; to extend as provided in this title the time for filing any
statement of claim; and to extend, upon due cause shown, the time for filing
any other pleading, statement, report or protest.
